California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(b) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2040.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 839, Sec. 2.   (AB 2643)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2040, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General License Provisions [1050. - 1110.]

1050.

(a) All licenses, permits, tags, reservations, and other entitlements authorized by this code shall be prepared and issued by the department.

(b) The commission shall determine the form of all licenses, permits, tags, reservations, and other entitlements and the method of carrying and displaying all licenses, and may require and prescribe the form of applications therefor and the form of any contrivance to be used in connection therewith, except for those programs where the department has fee-setting authority, in which case the department shall retain that authority.

(c) Whenever this code provides for a permit,
 license, tag, reservation, application, or other entitlement, the commission, in accordance with the provision, shall prescribe the terms and conditions under which the permit, license, tag, reservation, application, or other entitlement shall be issued, except for those programs where the department has fee-setting authority, in which case the department shall retain that authority. The department shall issue the permit, license, tag, reservation, application, or other entitlement in accordance therewith and with the applicable provisions of law.

(d) Except for fees set by the department pursuant to subdivision (e), whenever this code does not specify whether a fee is to be collected, or does not specify the amount of a fee to be collected, or does not expressly prohibit the adjustment of statutorily imposed fees by the commission by reference to this section for the issuance of any license, tag, permit, application, reservation, or other
 entitlement, the commission may establish a fee or the amount thereof by regulation. The commission may also provide for the change in the amount of the fee in accordance with Section 713. Fees established by the commission shall be in an amount sufficient to recover all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and commission relating to the program with regard to which the fee is paid. The commission may establish a fee structure that provides for the phasing in of new fees leading up to full cost recovery for the department and commission, provided that full cost recovery is achieved within five years of the establishment of the fee.

(e) The department may establish fees and may adjust statutorily imposed fees by regulation for the filings, permits, determinations, or other department actions described in Section 711.4, 1002, or 1609. The department also may provide for the change in the amount of the fee in
 accordance with Section 713. Fees established by the department shall be in an amount sufficient to recover all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department relating to the program with regard to which the fee is paid. The department may establish a fee structure that provides for the phasing in of new fees leading up to full cost recovery for the department, provided that full cost recovery is achieved within five years of the establishment of the fee.

(f) Whenever this code provides for a license, tag, permit, reservation, or other entitlement, the commission or department, as applicable, may establish a nonrefundable application fee, not to exceed seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) sufficient to pay the department’s costs for issuing the license, tag, permit, reservation, or other entitlement and may adjust the application fee in accordance with Section 713.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 5.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.1.

Any license, permit, tag, stamp, or other entitlement authorized pursuant to this code is not valid until it is filled out completely and accurately and the fee authorized or identified in statute or regulation for that entitlement is received and paid to the department or its agent. It is the responsibility of the user to ensure that the license, permit, tag, stamp, or other entitlement is filled out completely and accurately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the department may issue a temporary document that allows the holder of a license, permit, license tag, license stamp, application, reservation, or other entitlement purchased through the Internet to enjoy the privileges of the entitlement for a period not to exceed 30 calendar days from the date of purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.4.

(a) On or before January 1, 2023, the department may provide an option to display a sport fishing license, validation, report card, or other sport fishing entitlement issued pursuant to this code or regulations adopted pursuant to this code electronically on a mobile device.

(b) A person who displays a sport fishing license, validation, report card, or other sport fishing entitlement electronically on a mobile device in accordance with this section shall be deemed to be in compliance with any requirement imposed pursuant to this code or regulation adopted pursuant to this code to possess or affix the entitlement.

(c) This section does not apply to a tag that is required to be
 affixed to a fish pursuant to this code or a regulation adopted pursuant to this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 607, Sec. 1.   (AB 817)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.5.

The department may accept a credit card charge as a method of payment. Any contract executed by the department with credit card issuers or draft purchasers shall be consistent with Section 6159 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Title 1.3 (commencing with Section 1747) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, the department may impose a surcharge in an amount to cover the cost of providing the credit card service, including reimbursement for any fee or discount charged by the credit card issuer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.6.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the names and addresses contained in records submitted and retained by the department for the purpose of obtaining recreational fishing and hunting licenses are confidential and are not public records.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may release the confidential information described in subdivision (a) under the following circumstances:

(1) To an agent or authorized family member of the person to whom the information pertains.

(2) To an officer or employee of another governmental agency when necessary for the performance of his or her official duties.

(3) In accordance with Section 391.

(4) Pursuant to a court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.8.

(a) The department may issue collectible, commemorative licenses to any person for purposes of promoting and supporting licensed hunting, fishing, and resource conservation, subject to all of the following:

(1) A commemorative license may be designed and produced as the department may determine and shall be clearly marked and identified as a commemorative license, rendering it invalid for the take of any mammal, bird, fish, reptile, or amphibian.

(2) A commemorative license shall not confer any rights, privileges, or other entitlements to any person purchasing or in possession of such a license.

(3) Subdivision (a) of Section 1052, Section 1053.1, Article 2 (commencing with Section 3031) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 4, and Article 3 (commencing with Section 7145) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 6 do not apply to the purchase of a commemorative license. A commemorative license shall not qualify as evidence required in subdivision (a) of Section 3050.

(b) All funds derived from the sale of commemorative licenses shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 4.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

Licenses of each class shall be uniquely numbered. Every license shall contain its expiration date and the fee for which it is issued. If no fee is either required by this code or established by the commission pursuant to Section 1050, the license shall so indicate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 112, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Transfer any license, tag, stamp, permit, application, or reservation.

(b) Use or possess any license, tag, stamp, permit, application, or reservation that was not lawfully issued to the user or possessor thereof or that was obtained by fraud, deceit, or the use of a fake or counterfeit application form.

(c) Use or possess any fake or counterfeit license, tag, stamp, permit, permit application form, band, or seal, made or used for the purpose of evading any of the provisions of this code, or regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(d) Predate, fail to date, or alter any date of any license, tag, or permit.

(e) Postdate the date of application or the date of issuance of the license, tag, or permit. This subdivision does not apply to the date that a license, tag, or permit is valid.

(f) Alter, mutilate, deface, duplicate, or counterfeit any license, tag, permit, permit application form, band, or seal, or entries thereon, to evade the provisions of this code, or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.5.

Any stamp issued pursuant to this article is not valid unless affixed to the appropriate license document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.1.

(a) A person shall not obtain more than one license, permit, reservation, or other entitlement of the same class, or more than the number of tags authorized by statute or regulation for the same license year, except under one of the following conditions:

(1) Nonresident hunting licenses issued pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 3031, and short-term sport fishing licenses issued pursuant to paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 7149, and paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 7149.05.

(2) The loss or destruction of an unexpired license, tag, permit, reservation, or other
 entitlement, except a stamp or endorsement, as certified by the applicant’s signed affidavit and proof, as determined by the department, that the original license, tag, permit, reservation, or other entitlement was issued, and payment of a base fee of five dollars ($5). The base fee shall be adjusted annually pursuant to Section 713, not to exceed the fee for the original entitlement, as follows:

(A) The adjustment shall apply to the hunting license years commencing on or after July 1, 1996.

(B) The adjustment shall apply to the fishing license years commencing on or after January 1, 1996.

(3) The loss or destruction of a stamp or endorsement imprinted on a base license and payment of a base fee of three dollars ($3) for each stamp or endorsement replaced on any base license document, adjusted annually pursuant to
 Section 713, not to exceed the fee for the original entitlement. The base fee in this paragraph shall apply to the 2011 license year.

(b) This section applies only to licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements issued through the Automated License Data System.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 148, Sec. 2.   (AB 1995)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.5.

Applicants for hunting licenses shall first satisfactorily complete a hunter education equivalency examination and obtain a certificate of equivalency as provided by regulations adopted by the commission, or show proof of completion of a hunter education training course, or show a previous year’s hunting license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 22.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

(a) It is unlawful to submit, or conspire to submit, any false, inaccurate, or otherwise misleading information on any application or other document offered or otherwise presented to the department for any purpose, including, but not limited to, obtaining a license, tag, permit, or other privilege or entitlement pursuant to this code or regulations adopted thereto.

(b) The department may require the applicant for a license, tag, permit, or other privilege or entitlement to show proof of the statements or facts required for the issuance of any license, tag, permit, or other privilege or entitlement.

(c) For purposes of this section, “department” includes any department employee, license agent, or any person performing the duties of a department employee or license agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.2.

Every person while engaged in taking any bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, or reptile shall have on his or her person or in his or her immediate possession, or where otherwise specifically required by law to be kept, any license, tag, stamp, or permit that is required in order to take the bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, or reptile. In the case of a person diving from a boat, the license or permit may be kept on the boat, or in the case of a person diving from shore, the license or permit may be kept within 500 yards of the shore.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.5.

The department may issue and shall collect payment for any entitlement, document, or authorization for which a fee is authorized pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 5.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.8.

(a) The department shall establish, and keep current, written policies and procedures relating to the application process and the award of hunting tags for fundraising purposes, as authorized pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 331, subdivision (d) of Section 332, Section 4334, or subdivision (d) of Section 4902.

(b) The policies and procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The application process and criteria.

(2) A standard application format.

(3) An appeal process.

(4) A requirement that all applications shall remain sealed until on or after a filing date specified by the department.

(c) The department shall make the policies and procedures available to interested parties 30 days before their implementation and shall receive and consider any related recommendations.

(d) The department shall not require a minimum tag sale price, except as otherwise provided in this code.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department develop policies and procedures that seek to maximize both the revenues received by the department and participation by qualified nonprofit organizations making application to sell the tags as sellers of the tags.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.1.

(a) Any person, except a commissioner, officer, or employee of the department, may submit an application to the department to be a license agent to issue licenses, permits, reservations, tags, or other entitlements.

(b) A person shall only be authorized to be a license agent to issue licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements, upon the written approval of the department.

(c) The department may provide licenses, permits, reservations, tags, or other entitlements to authorized license agents and shall collect, prior to delivery, an amount equal to the fees for all licenses, permits, reservations, tags and other entitlements provided. Any license agent who pays the fees prior to
 delivery for licenses, permits, reservations, tags, or other entitlements is exempt from Sections 1056, 1057, and 1059. Any licenses, permits, reservations, tags, or other entitlements provided pursuant to this subdivision that remain unissued at the end of the license year may be returned to the department for refund or credit, or a combination thereof, within six months of the item expiration date. No credit may be allowed after six months following the last day of the license year.

(d) Authorized license agents shall add a handling charge to the fees prescribed in this code or in regulations adopted pursuant to this code for any license, permit, reservation, tag, and other entitlement issued by the license agent in an amount that is 5 percent of the face value of the item rounded to the nearest five cents ($0.05).

(e) The handling charge added pursuant to subdivision (d) shall
 be incorporated into the total amount collected for issuing the license, permit, reservation, tag, and other entitlement, but the handling charge shall not be included when determining license fees in accordance with Section 713. A license agent may issue any license, permit, reservation, tag, or other entitlement for any amount up to 10 percent less than the fee prescribed in this code or in regulations adopted pursuant to this code. The license agent shall remit to the department the full amount of the fees as prescribed in this code or in regulations adopted pursuant to this code for all licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements issued.

(f) The handling charge required by subdivision (d) is the license agent’s only compensation for services. The license agent shall not be entitled to any other additional fee or charge for issuing any license, permit, reservation, tag, or other entitlement authorized pursuant to this
 section.

(g) The department may designate a nonprofit organization, organized pursuant to the laws of this state, or the California chapter of a nonprofit organization, organized pursuant to the laws of another state, as a license agent for the sale of lifetime licenses issued pursuant to Sections 3031.2 and 7149.2. These licenses may be sold by auction or by other methods and are not subject to the fee limitations prescribed in this code. An agent authorized to issue lifetime sport fishing licenses and lifetime hunting
 licenses under this subdivision is exempt from subdivisions (d) and (f). The license agent shall remit to the department the fees from the sale of lifetime licenses as defined in Sections 3031.2 and 7149.2.

(h) This section applies only to licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements issued through the Automated License Data System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 5.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.3.

The department may authorize any person other than a commissioner or an officer or employee of the department to issue, as an agent of the department, annual wildlife area passes and native species stamps, and to sell promotional materials and nature study aids pursuant to, and subject to the requirements of, this article. An agent thus authorized may add a handling charge pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 1055.1 to the fee prescribed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1760) of Chapter 7.5 of Division 2 for each annual wildlife area pass or native species stamp issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 14.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), each license agent authorized pursuant to Section 1055.1 shall remit to the department the fees prescribed in this code or in regulations adopted pursuant to this code for all licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements by electronic means, such as electronic fund transfer. In order to facilitate the prompt remittance of revenues, the department is authorized to withdraw funds from the bank account of the license agent, including adjustments, by electronic transfer. License agents shall ensure that the total fees required for all licenses, permits, reservations, tags, or other entitlements necessary to perform the electronic transfer are available on the date specified by the license agent contract.

(b) A license agent shall report to the department on or before the end of the next business day of the department any losses of fees received from the issuing of licenses, permits, reservations, tags, or other entitlements.

(c) The license agent may retain not more than fifteen cents ($0.15) of the fee received for each Colorado River special use validation issued pursuant to Section 7180.1 as compensation for services. The license agent shall remit to the department the fees prescribed by Section 7180.1, less any amounts retained under this subdivision, for all Colorado River special use validations issued. The license agent shall remit the net fees as prescribed in subdivision (a).

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any fees not transmitted or made available to the department within seven days following the due date as specified by the department are delinquent, and delinquent fees are subject to interest and penalties prescribed in subdivision (b) of Section 1059. Interest and penalties shall be computed beginning one day following the due date as specified by the department.

(e) This section applies only to licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements issued through the Automated License Data System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 453, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.

A license agent who fails to transmit the fees or accounting reports required by Section 1055.6 not later than 60 days following the due date as specified by the department may be required to execute, in favor of the department, a bond, payable to the department, in a sum determined by the department in order to continue as a license agent. The bond shall secure the accurate accounting and payment to the department of the funds collected and the performance of the duties imposed upon the license agent by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 11.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.

All license, tag, permit, reservation, and other entitlement money shall be accounted for separately from other funds of a license agent, and shall at all times belong to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 453, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.

In case of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, receivership, or bankruptcy, the state shall have a preferred claim against the license agent’s assignee, receiver, or trustee for all moneys owing the state for the issuing of licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements as provided in this code and shall not be estopped from asserting that claim by reason of the commingling of funds or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 33.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1059.

(a) The failure or refusal of any license agent to account for licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements, or any fees received from their issuance as required by Section 1055.6 or upon demand by an authorized representative of the department is a misdemeanor.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), any license agent who fails to remit fees to the department on or before the date required by Section 1055.6 shall pay interest and penalties prescribed for sales and use taxes and, except as otherwise provided in this code, the department shall collect amounts owing under the procedures prescribed for sales and use taxes provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451)
 and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6701) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, insofar as they may be applicable, and for those purposes, “board” means the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 12.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1061.

(a) The department may allow a person to purchase a license voucher as a gift for a licensee when the licensee’s complete and accurate personal information, as defined in regulation, is not provided by the license buyer at the time of purchase.

(b) A license purchase voucher entitles the holder of the voucher to redeem it for the specific license, permit, tag, or other privilege or entitlement, and license year for which it was purchased.

(c) A license purchase voucher shall expire and be considered void if not redeemed within the license year for which it was purchased.

(d) A license purchase voucher may be issued and redeemed by a person authorized by the department to issue licenses.

(e) The license agent handling fee, as provided under subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) of Section 1055.1, shall only apply to the sale of the license purchase voucher.

(f) This section applies only to licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other entitlements issued through the Automated License Data System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 34.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.

(a) A nonprofit conservation organization seeking promotion, exposure, and awareness of the organization on the Automated License Data System Online License Service Internet Web site, as feasible, through the display of the organization’s logo, or other graphics agreed upon by the organization and the department, to give a prospective license buyer the opportunity to link electronically to the organization’s Internet home page, shall submit, by September 30 of each year, a letter to the department providing evidence that the organization meets the criteria set forth in subdivision (c). If the department determines
 that the nonprofit conservation organization is eligible, it shall include the organization’s logo
 or other graphics in a space with a link to the organization’s Internet home page on the Automated License Data System Online License Service Internet Web site for a time period agreed upon by both parties.

(b) The department may impose a charge on a nonprofit conservation organization for inclusion on the Automated License Data System Online License Service Internet Web site pursuant to subdivision (a) that shall not exceed the
 costs associated with the direct administration of this section.

(c) As used in this section, “nonprofit conservation organization” means an entity that the department determines meets all of the following:

(1) It is a nonprofit organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of that code (26 U.S.C.
 Sec. 501(a)).

(2) It is registered with the Attorney General.

(3) Its goals and objectives are related to the conservation of sport fish or game species.

(4) In at least one of the previous three calendar years, it has entered into, or been obligated under, a contract or other agreement, including, but not limited to, a license, easement, memorandum of understanding, or lease, with the department to perform habitat or other wildlife conservation work, to provide hunting or fishing opportunities for the public, to raise funds on behalf of the department, including, but not limited to, the sale of hunting
 fundraising tags or related items, or to otherwise provide assistance to the department that is consistent with the department’s mission.

(d) The department shall deposit revenues of the charge imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, to be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, exclusively to pay all initial and ongoing costs associated with the direct administration of this section, including, but not limited to, a portion of the costs of making changes to the Automated License Data System necessary to implement this section. 

(e) The
 department shall implement the links from the Automated License Data System Online License Service Internet Web site by January 1, 2015, if it determines that date is feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   (SB 1107)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1069.

The director may enter into an agreement with the Secretary of Food and Agriculture for the collection of an assessment on behalf of any marketing council or commission for fish or seafood organized under the Food and Agricultural Code. The agreement may authorize the department to collect the assessment in conjunction with the collection of landing fees on those species for which the marketing council or commission is organized. The department shall remit the amount of the assessment collected to the Secretary of Food and Agriculture according to the agreement after making the collection. Before remitting the assessments, the department may deduct an administrative fee in an amount agreed to with the Secretary of Food and Agriculture to pay the costs of collection and remission of the assessments. The administrative fees shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 6.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1110.

Section 1110 as added to this code by the initiative measure adopted at the General Election of November 8, 1938, is set forth at Section 7891 of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.   Note: The provisions of Section 1110, as added November 8, 1938, by initiative Proposition 5, were relocated to Section 7891 in the 1957 code reenactment.  This Section 1110 serves as a cross-reference, and it is not part of Article 2, commencing with Section 1050.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Fish Hatcheries [1120. - 1126.]

1120.

The commission shall establish fish hatcheries for stocking the waters of this State with fish. The department shall maintain and operate such hatcheries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1121.

In any lease entered into whereby the state leases from any county, city, irrigation district, or other public agency in this state, real property for the purpose of establishing or maintaining a fish hatchery, the state may agree to indemnify and hold harmless the lessor by reason of the uses authorized by such lease. Insurance may be purchased by the Department of General Services to protect the state against loss or expense arising out of such an agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

1122.

Any claim for damages arising against the state under Section 1121 shall be presented to the Department of General Services in accordance with Section 905.2 of the Government Code, and if not covered by insurance provided pursuant to Section 1121, the claim shall be payable only out of funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose. If the state elects to insure its liability under Section 1121, the Department of General Services may automatically deny the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 27.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1122.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of General Services, with the consent of the department, may lease to the Friends of the Mount Whitney Hatchery, at no cost, and subject to any other terms and conditions that the director deems appropriate, for a term not to exceed 25 years, and with the possibility of renewal, the Mount Whitney Fish Hatchery, or any part of the hatchery, situated in the County of Inyo.

(b) Any part of the hatchery that is leased pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used for environmental education purposes and other related activities designed to benefit the hatchery and the community.

(c) The lease shall require
 the Friends of the Mount Whitney Fish Hatchery to permit reasonable public access to the hatchery, to obtain and maintain liability insurance for the leased portion of the hatchery, and to maintain the leased portion of the hatchery at all times. The lease shall provide that any work done on the hatchery shall be performed in consultation with the State Office of Historic Preservation. The lease shall also provide that the state, agents of the state, the department, and agents of the department shall be held harmless from, and indemnified against, any liability resulting from the acts or omissions of the Friends of the Mount Whitney Fish Hatchery arising out of performance of the lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 16.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1122.6.

(a) The Director of General Services, with the consent of the department, may lease to the Mt. Shasta Museum Association at no cost, and subject to any other terms and conditions that the director deems appropriate, for a term not to exceed 25 years, and with the possibility of renewal, a portion of the Mount Shasta Fish Hatchery, a building commonly known as Building A and the storage building constructed for use by the lessee of Building A, situated in the County of Siskiyou.

(b) The leased property shall be used only for the operation of a historical museum and for environmental educational purposes.

(c) The lease shall require the Mt. Shasta Museum Association to permit
 reasonable public access to the building, to obtain and maintain liability insurance for the leased building, and to maintain the leased building at all times.

(d) The lease shall also provide that the state, agents of the state, the department, and agents of the department shall be held harmless from, and indemnified against, any liability resulting from the acts or omissions of the Mt. Shasta Museum Association performed in the course of the lease agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 127, Sec. 2.   (SB 1009)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1123.

The department may purchase and import spawn or ova of fish suitable for food, and stock with such spawn or ova the waters of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1123.5.

Notwithstanding Section 1120 or any other provision of law, all funds allocated for fish purchases for the department’s urban fishing program shall be used to purchase all fish and aquatic organisms by contract, pursuant to the requirements of the Public Contract Code, from private registered aquaculture facilities within the state unless the department determines one of the following conditions exists:

(a) After reasonable notice, the private facilities are unable to provide the specified fish or aquatic organism.

(b) The fish or aquatic organism is infected or diseased.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 810, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1124.

It is unlawful to take any fish in any pond, reservoir, or other water-retaining structure belonging to or controlled by the department and used for propagating, raising, holding, protecting, or conserving fish.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1125.

The Secretary of the Interior of the United States and his duly authorized agents may conduct fish cultural operations and scientific investigations in the waters of this State in such a manner and at such times as may be jointly considered necessary and proper by the secretary and his agents, and the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1248.)
-------------------------------------------

1126.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, department personnel may construct or repair bird exclosures at state owned or operated fish hatcheries. These activities shall not be subject to review by the Public Works Board. Nothing in this section exempts the department from complying with any provision of law governing services performed under contract by noncivil service employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 6.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. County Fish Hatcheries [1150. - 1150.]

1150.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties may establish and maintain fish hatcheries, and may purchase the spawn or ova of fish.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Private Nonprofit Hatcheries [1170. - 1175.]

1170.

The commission may issue a permit, subject to such restrictions and regulations as the commission deems desirable, to a nonprofit organization to construct and operate an anadromous fish hatchery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 862.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

The commission shall not issue a permit unless it determines the nonprofit organization has the financial capability to successfully construct and operate the hatchery and will diligently and properly conduct the operation authorized under the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 862.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

No permit will be issued which may tend to deplete the natural runs of anadromous fish, result in waste or deterioration of fish, or when the proposed operation is located on a stream or river below a state or federal fish hatchery or egg-taking station.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 862.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

All fish handled under authority of this article during the time they are in the hatchery or in the wild are the property of the state and when in the wild may be taken under the authority of a sport or commercial fishing license as otherwise authorized for wild fish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 862.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

Any permit granted by the commission pursuant to this article shall contain all of the following conditions:

(a) If after a hearing the commission finds that the operation described in the permit and conducted pursuant to this article is not in the best public interest, the commission may alter the conditions of the permit to mitigate the adverse effects, or may cause an orderly termination of the operation under the permit. An orderly termination shall not exceed a three-year period and shall culminate in the revocation of the permit in its entirety.
